Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2723
Probate books, enumeration.

The probate books shall consist of a probate record, a fee book, a general index to probate records, an index to wills deposited, and such additional records as are needed to carry out the provisions of the Nebraska Probate Code.

G.S.1873, c. 14, § 32, p. 270;

Laws 1895, c. 31, § 1, p. 156;

Laws 1909, c. 41, § 1, p. 228;

R.S.1913, § 1233;

C.S.1922, § 1156;

C.S.1929, § 27-535;

R.S.1943, § 24-535;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 54;

Laws 1975, LB 481, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-554.

Nebraska Probate Code, see section 30-2201.